Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2107.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 5507YH (5) 91 dg/ko H.F. 2107 Section 1. STATEWIDE CHILD CARE SOLUTIONS FUND 1 PROGRAM. There is appropriated from the general fund of the 2 state to the department of health and human services for the 3 fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027, 4 the following amount, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be 5 used for the purposes designated: 6 To administer, and provide matching moneys through, the 7 statewide child care solutions fund program: 8 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,500,000 9